Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-629
Unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services; penalty.

A person commits the offense of unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services if, upon applying for such services with a sales form processor, such person makes or causes to be made a statement or report which is false in some material respect relative to the type of goods or services provided by such person to his or her customers or the method by which such person solicits or concludes sales transactions with his or her customers.

Any person committing the offense of unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 13.